Arkansas, session 2025, HB1118.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 24-11-203(k), concerning certification of
funding recommended for disbursement of premium tax funds to underfunded
municipal fire and police relief and pension plans, is repealed.
(k)(1) On or before June 15 of each fiscal year, the Arkansas Fire and
Police Pension Review Board shall certify to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State the amount of funding it recommends for disbursement in the ensuing
fiscal year to underfunded municipal fire and police relief and pension plans
as defined in § 24-11-217.
(2) After receiving the certification required under subdivision
(k)(1) of this section, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall
immediately transfer on his or her books and the books of the Treasurer of
State the lesser of the total amount recommended by the Arkansas Fire and
Police Pension Review Board or the amount appropriated by the General
Assembly for the ensuing fiscal year from the Revenue Holding Fund Account to
*LJH037*
02-05-2025 09:29:35 LJH037

As Engrossed: H2/5/25 HB1118
the Firemen's and Police Officers' Pension and Relief Fund for distribution
to the recommended underfunded plans.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 24-11-211(a), concerning the creation and
administration of the Arkansas Policemen's Pension Supplement Program, is
amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) There is created the Arkansas Policemen's Pension Supplement
Program, to be administered by the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review
Board Department of Finance and Administration.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 24-11-211(b)(2)—(c)(2), concerning funding
and administration of the Policemen's Pension Supplement Program Fund, are
amended to read as follows:
(2) The Policemen's Pension Supplement Program Fund shall be
funded by that portion of those unallocated premium taxes levied on insurers
for the support of police retirement programs that is transferred to the
control of the board department under § 24-11-215(c).
(c)(1) The board department shall administer the program and make the
payments called for under the program, including formulating necessary rules,
procedures, and forms.
(2) The board department may retain one percent (1%) of the
funds transferred for administrative expenses of the program.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 24-11-211(f)-(g), concerning payments and
certification of transfers related to the Policemen's Pension Supplement
Program Fund, are amended to read as follows:
(f) On or after July 1 of each fiscal year following the board's
payments required by subsection (e) of this section, the board shall pay to
the State Treasury the amounts transferred to the board under § 24-11-215(c)
that exceed the amounts the board is required to pay under the program.
(g)(1) The program is effective July 1, 1999.
(2) The first payments may be made under the program beginning
July 31, 1999, and the first transfer under § 24-11-215(c) shall occur on
July 25, 1999, and on each July 25 thereafter.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 24-11-212(b), concerning the administration
02-05-2025 09:29:35 LJH037

As Engrossed: H2/5/25 HB1118
of the Future Supplement Fund, is amended to read as follows:
(b) The Future Supplement Fund shall be administered by the Arkansas
Fire and Police Pension Review Board Department of Finance and
Administration.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 24-11-212(f), concerning the use of
allocations in previous years that were not distributed for the Future
Supplement Fund, is amended to read as follows:
(f) The Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board department may
use an amount allocated in previous years that has not been distributed for
the Future Supplement Fund to:
(1) Ensure the distribution of an amount listed in subdivision
(d)(1) of this section; and
(2) Help offset a reduction described in § 24-11-215.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 24-11-213(b), concerning the allocation of
funds between the Firemen's and Police Officers' Pension and Relief Fund and
the General Revenue Fund Account, is amended to read as follows:
(b) The allocation of funds between the Firemen's and Police Officers'
Pension and Relief Fund and the General Revenue Fund Account under this
section is subject to the following conditions:
(1) The Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board Department
of Finance and Administration shall review annually the distribution of funds
to each qualified city, town, or fire protection district made in the
previous calendar year before disbursing funds to an area qualified under §
24-11-214; and
(2) The board department shall consider as part of the annual
assessment of the allocation of the disbursement of funds under § 24-11-214:
(A) The certification of a new city, town, or fire
protection district for participation in the Firemen's and Police Officers'
Pension and Relief Fund; and
(B) A change in the legal description of a city, town, or
fire protection district, which shall be reported to the board department
annually by December 14.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 24-11-214(b)(2)(B), concerning the
02-05-2025 09:29:35 LJH037

As Engrossed: H2/5/25 HB1118
actuarial cost for a calendar year to determine the amount of the premium tax
revenues, is amended to read as follows:
(B) For a group that is covered by a local policemen's
pension and relief fund or a local firemen's relief and pension fund, shall
be the cost calculated by the actuary for the Arkansas Fire and Police
Pension Review Board Department of Finance and Administration for the
preceding calendar year; and

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 24-11-214(c), concerning the calculation of
the amount of the premium tax revenues, is amended to read as follows:
(c) The amount of revenues to be directed to cities, towns, and fire
protection districts shall equal the amount in the Firemen's and Police
Officers' Pension and Relief Fund less the payment for the administrative and
actuarial expenses of the board Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board
under subsection (i) of this section and under § 24-11-203.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 24-11-214(f)(2), concerning the timing of
the certification by the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board, is
amended to read as follows:
(2) On or before June 15 of each calendar year after 2002 2025,
the board shall certify to the Department of Finance and Administration shall
certify the exact amount of tax revenues each city, town, or fire protection
district is entitled to receive for the calendar year under this section.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 24-11-214(h)—(i), concerning fees and
expenses for the administration of this section, is amended to read as
follows:
(h)(1) There shall be no administrative fees charged to these entities
by the board department upon qualification.
(2) The board department shall incur all administrative and
actuarial costs associated with obtaining the information required under this
section.
(i)(1) The board department shall establish a certain percentage of
the insurance tax revenues to use to meet its proper actuarial expenses and
administrative costs incurred in obtaining and evaluating the population
information required under § 24-11-213, but in no event shall the board
02-05-2025 09:29:35 LJH037

As Engrossed: H2/5/25 HB1118
department be entitled to more than one percent (1%) of the Firemen's and
Police Officers' Pension and Relief Fund as defined in § 24-11-809(a)(2).
(2) This assessment shall be collected in addition to the
assessment provided in § 24-11-203.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 24-11-214(l), concerning the promulgation
of rules for the implementation of this section, is amended to read as
follows:
(1) The Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board department shall
may promulgate rules that are necessary to implement this section.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 24-11-215(c), concerning annual transfers
to the Arkansas Policemen's Pension Supplement Program, is amended to read as
follows:
(c) After transfers are made to cover funds distributed under
subsection (b) of this section and the portion of those premium taxes set
aside for transfer to the State Police Retirement Fund under § 24-6-209(b),
the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration is directed to
make annual transfers from the police portion of the revenues to the
Policemen's Pension Supplement Program Fund on or before July 25, 1999, and
each year thereafter as certified by the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension
Review Board on July 1 each year as the amount needed to pay the expenses of
and to make payments to the eligible retired police officers and survivors
under the Arkansas Policemen's Pension Supplement Program for the coming year
of the program.

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 24-11-217(c), concerning approval of
additional allocations to the policemen's pension and relief funds and
firemen's relief and pension funds, is amended to read as follows:
(c) The policemen's pension and relief funds and firemen's relief and
pension funds shall qualify for the additional allocation after approval of
the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board and after meeting the
following criteria:
(1) The policemen's pension and relief fund or the firemen's
relief and pension fund is in compliance with all applicable laws and rules;
(2) The policemen's pension and relief fund or the firemen's
02-05-2025 09:29:35 LJH037

As Engrossed: H2/5/25 HB1118
relief and pension fund shall receive employer contributions other than
premium tax allocations that are at least eighty percent (80%) of the
actuarial cost under § 24-11-214 during the calendar year before an
allocation; and
(3)(A) A firemen's relief and pension fund that provides
benefits to volunteer members shall receive funding without meeting the
employer contribution requirement described in subdivision (c)(2) of this
section if the firemen's relief and pension fund is:
(i) Less than fifty percent (50%) funded as of the
most recent actuarial valuation; and
(ii) Administered by the Arkansas Local Police and
Fire Retirement System.
(B) The funding under this subsection shall be eliminated
to meet the criteria of § 24-11-215(e)(2)(A) notwithstanding the requirement
of § 24-11-215(d).

SECTION 15. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the management of premium
taxes collected for the benefit of municipal firemen's relief and pension
funds and policemen's pension and relief funds is in need of a change in
administration from the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board to the
Department of Finance and Administration for purposes of financial security
and efficiency; and that it is necessary for this act to have an effective
date of July 1, 2025, in order to allow for a structured and proper
administration of the procedures referenced in this act. Therefore, an
emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the
preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective
on July 1, 2025.

/s/Warren






02-05-2025 09:29:35 LJH037